src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_SIVISTYNYT
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 47 front
!!€ sivistynyt: sivistynyt+N+Sg+Nom # civilised
!!€ sivistyneenä: sivistynyt+N+Sg+Ess
0:yt  N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ee   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:yt      N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:ee   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:yt  N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ee  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

!! !Old e^ stems
!! The e final words that have lost final consonant inflect like consonant
!! final words, including the inverse consonant gradation. This class
!! includes all deverbal -e suffixed nouns.

LEXICON N_ASTE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 back
!!€ aste: aste+N+Sg+Nom # grade
!!€ asteena: aste+N+Sg+Ess
0   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PISTE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 Front
!!€ piste: piste+N+Sg+Nom full stop
!!€ pisteenä: piste+N+Sg+Ess
0   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KASTIKE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 back ke
!!€ kastike: kastike+N+Sg+Nom # sauce
!!€ kastikkeena: kastike+N+Sg+Ess
0:e       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kee   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:et   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:kee   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_LÄÄKE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 front ke
!!€ lääke: lääke+N+Sg+Nom # medicine
!!€ lääkkeenä: lääke+N+Sg+Ess
0:e       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kee   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:et    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:kee   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_APE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 back pe
!!€ ape: ape+N+Sg+Nom # grub
!!€ appeena: ape+N+Sg+Ess
0:e       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pee   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:et   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:pee   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:pe   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:pe   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:pe   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pe   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:pe   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:pe  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:pe  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_RIPE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 front pe
!!€ ripe: ripe+N+Sg+Nom # leftovers
!!€ rippeenä: ripe+N+Sg+Ess
0:e       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pee   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:et    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:pee   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:pe      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:pe      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_LAITE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 back te
!!€ laite: laite+N+Sg+Nom # machine
!!€ laitteena: laite+N+Sg+Ess
0:e       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:et   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tee   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:te   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KÄSITE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 front te
!!€ käsite: käsite+N+Sg+Nom # concept
!!€ käsitteenä: käsite+N+Sg+Ess
0:e       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:et    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tee   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KOE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 back 0k
!!€ koe: koe+N+Sg+Nom # test
!!€ kokeena: koe+N+Sg+Ess
0:e       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kee   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:et   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:kee   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PYYHE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 front 0k
!!€ pyyhe: pyyhe+N+Sg+Nom # towel
!!€ pyyhkeenä: pyyhe+N+Sg+Ess
0:e       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kee   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:et    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:kee   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_TARVE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 back ve
!!€ tarve: tarve+N+Sg+Nom # need
!!€ tarpeena: tarve+N+Sg+Ess
0:ve       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pee   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:vet   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:pee   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:pe   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:pe   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:pe   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pe   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:pe   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ve   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:pe  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:pe  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_VIIVE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 front ve
!!€ lieve: lieve+N+Sg+Nom tux tail
!!€ liepeenä: lieve+N+Sg+Ess
0:ve       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pee   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:vet    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:pee   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ve       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:pe      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:pe      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KIDE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 48 front de
!!€ kide: kide+N+Sg+Nom # crystal
!!€ kiteenä: kide+N+Sg+Ess
0:de       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:det    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tee   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:de       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON  N
ape+N:ap N_APE  ;
arenaviridae+N:arenavirida N_KOE  ;
dippauskastike+N:dippaus#kastik N_KASTIKE  ;
ehdokkuuspuhe+N:ehdokkuus#puhe   N_ASTE  ;
eksynyt+N:eksyn N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
eliniänodote+N:eliniänodot N_LAITE  ;
energianlähde+N:energian#läh N_KIDE  ;
erääntynyt+N:erääntyn N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
flunssalääke+N:flunssa#lääk N_LÄÄKE  ;
froteepyyhe+N:frotee#pyyh N_PYYHE  ;
hameenlieve+N:hameen#lie N_VIIVE  ;
havaintoväline+N:havainto#väline    N_PISTE  ;
heinänhelve+N:heinän#hel N_VIIVE  ;
helve+N:hel N_VIIVE  ;
heräte+N:herät N_KÄSITE  ;
hiomalaite+N:hiomalait N_LAITE  ;
hiue+N:hiu N_KOE  ;
hiutale+N:hiutale   N_ASTE  ;
hypokloorihapoke+N:hypokloorihapok N_KASTIKE  ;
hyönteistiede+N:hyönteis#tie N_KIDE  ;
häiriintynyt+N:häiriintyn N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
hämmentynyt+N:hämmentyn N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
häränseläke+N:härän#seläk N_LÄÄKE  ;
ilmaisutarve+N:ilmaisu#tar N_TARVE  ;
juliste+N:juliste   N_ASTE  ;
jähmepiste+N:jähmepiste    N_PISTE  ;
jäljite+N:jäljit N_KÄSITE  ;
jälkeenjäänyt+N:jälkeenjään N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
kaasulähde+N:kaasu#läh N_KIDE  ;
kampe+N:kamp N_APE  ;
kansaneläke+N:kansan#eläk N_LÄÄKE  ;
karstaohdake+N:karsta#ohdak N_KASTIKE  ;
karve+N:kar N_TARVE  ;
kasvipeite+N:kasvi#peit N_KÄSITE  ;
kasvituote+N:kasvi#tuot N_LAITE  ;
kasvopyyhe+N:kasvo#pyyh N_PYYHE  ;
katonlape+N:katon#lap N_APE  ;
kauppatase+N:kauppa#tase   N_ASTE  ;
keittiöväline+N:keittiö#väline    N_PISTE  ;
kenttäkoe+N:kenttä#ko N_KOE  ;
ketjusäe+N:ketju#sä N_PYYHE  ;
kide+N:ki N_KIDE  ;
koivuvyöhyke+N:koivu#vyöhyk N_LÄÄKE  ;
kuittilomake+N:kuitti#lomak N_KASTIKE  ;
kukkaseppele+N:kukka#seppele    N_PISTE  ;
kuormituskoe+N:kuormitus#ko N_KOE  ;
kuvanauhoite+N:kuva#nauhoit N_LAITE  ;
kuve+N:ku N_TARVE  ;
kylpypyyhe+N:kylpy#pyyh N_PYYHE  ;
kynte+N:kynt N_KÄSITE  ;
laivavene+N:laivavene   N_ASTE  ;
lape+N:lap N_APE  ;
lappukoe+N:lappu#ko N_KOE  ;
latomisvirhe+N:latomis#virhe    N_PISTE  ;
lehtimetsävyöhyke+N:lehti#metsä#vyöhyk N_LÄÄKE  ;
lieve+N:lie N_VIIVE  ;
live+N:li N_VIIVE  ;
loppusäe+N:loppu#sä N_PYYHE  ;
lujike+N:lujik N_KASTIKE  ;
luonnonlähde+N:luonnon#läh N_KIDE  ;
maisterinseppele+N:maisterin#seppele    N_PISTE  ;
marenkikuorrute+N:marenki#kuorrut N_LAITE  ;
mennyt+N:menn N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
metsästäjänleike+N:metsästäjän#leik N_LÄÄKE  ;
miehuuskoe+N:miehuus#ko N_KOE  ;
muistopuhe+N:muisto#puhe   N_ASTE  ;
naamiointiväline+N:naamiointi#väline    N_PISTE  ;
napajännite+N:napa#jännit N_KÄSITE  ;
nelisäe+N:neli#sä N_PYYHE  ;
nivustaive+N:nivus#tai N_TARVE  ;
näennäistiede+N:näennäis#tie N_KIDE  ;
olake+N:olak N_KASTIKE  ;
peliote+N:peli#ot N_LAITE  ;
pesutarvike+N:pesu#tarvik N_KASTIKE  ;
piikkilankaeste+N:piikki#lanka#este    N_PISTE  ;
pikakirjoituskone+N:pikakirjoitus#kone   N_ASTE  ;
pilottikoe+N:pilotti#ko N_KOE  ;
piristynyt+N:piristyn N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
poismennyt+N:poismenn N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
puikkolisäke+N:puikko#lisäk N_LÄÄKE  ;
päiväpeite+N:päivä#peit N_KÄSITE  ;
pätemisentarve+N:pätemisen#tar N_TARVE  ;
raape+N:raap N_APE  ;
rantapyyhe+N:ranta#pyyh N_PYYHE  ;
rasituskoe+N:rasitus#ko N_KOE  ;
ravintolähde+N:ravinto#läh N_KIDE  ;
rengasliike+N:rengasliik N_KASTIKE  ;
ripe+N:rip N_RIPE  ;
rompe+N:romp N_APE  ;
rove+N:ro N_TARVE  ;
ruohoalue+N:ruoho#alue   N_ASTE  ;
saate+N:saat N_LAITE  ;
silmäke+N:silmäk N_LÄÄKE  ;
silosäe+N:silosä N_PYYHE  ;
sivistynyt+N:sivistyn N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
solmioteline+N:solmio#teline    N_PISTE  ;
suolilieve+N:suoli#lie N_VIIVE  ;
suusumute+N:suu#sumut N_LAITE  ;
syyte+N:syyt N_KÄSITE  ;
säie+N:säi N_KOE  ;
takalieve+N:taka#lie N_VIIVE  ;
takinlieve+N:takin#lie N_VIIVE  ;
tappoase+N:tappoase   N_ASTE  ;
tartarikastike+N:tartarikastik N_KASTIKE  ;
tarve+N:tar N_TARVE  ;
tietolähde+N:tieto#läh N_KIDE  ;
tuulitunnelikoe+N:tuuli#tunneli#ko N_KOE  ;
typpilannoite+N:typpi#lannoit N_LAITE  ;
uloskääntynyt+N:uloskääntyn N_SIVISTYNYT  ;
ulostuslääke+N:ulostus#lääk N_LÄÄKE  ;
umpierite+N:umpi#erit N_KÄSITE  ;
unentarve+N:unen#tar N_TARVE  ;
varmuusväline+N:varmuus#väline    N_PISTE  ;
varpe+N:varp N_APE  ;
vekkihame+N:vekki#hame   N_ASTE  ;
viljalyhde+N:vilja#lyh N_KIDE  ;
virrensäe+N:virrensä N_PYYHE  ;
vitamiinintarve+N:vitamiinin#tar N_TARVE  ;
voimanripe+N:voiman#rip N_RIPE  ;
ylijännite+N:yli#jännit N_KÄSITE  ;
yrttilääke+N:yrtti#lääk N_LÄÄKE  ;
yövaate+N:yö#vaat N_LAITE  ;
äidinmaidonvastike+N:äidin#maidon#vastik N_KASTIKE  ;
